Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3869
(UTC 804) Prudent administration.

(UTC 804) A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering the purposes, terms, distributional requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 69.